Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.032

Maintenance costs, operating budget—Debt-financed pass-through money, budget document.

(1) Normal maintenance costs shall be programmed in the operating budget rather than in the capital budget.

(2) All debt-financed pass-through money to local governments shall be programmed and separately identified in the budget document.

[ 1997 c 96 s 5; (2005 c 488 s 921 expired June 30, 2007); (2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 921 expired June 30, 2005); 1994 c 219 s 4; 1989 c 311 s 1.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2005 c 488 ss 920 and 921: See note following RCW 43.135.045.

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective dates—2005 c 488: See notes following RCW 28B.50.360.

Expiration date—Severability—Effective dates—2003 1st sp.s. c 26: See notes following RCW 43.135.045.

Findings—Purpose—1997 c 96: See note following RCW 43.82.150.

Finding—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.88.030.